Mississippi, session 2026, HB335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Subject to appropriation, the Office of Workforce Development, shall pilot the Mississippi Workforce Dual Enrollment for Career and Technical Education Grant Program.  The Office of Workforce Development shall distribute any funds received for the program to the Delta Workforce Investment Area, the Twin Districts Workforce Investment Area, the Mississippi Partnership Workforce Investment Area and the Southcentral Mississippi Workforce Investment Area for the purpose of funding dual enrollment courses at community colleges, where such courses qualify as a priority sector strategy, as established by the office. (2)  Each workforce investment area shall pay a grant to each community college in an amount equal to One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) per credit hour per student for each student who is enrolled in a dual enrollment course that meets the definition of a priority sector strategy as determined by the office.  The grants shall be used by the community colleges to pay for the costs of educating a career and technical education dual enrollment student.  The Office of Workforce Development shall prescribe the terms and conditions of the grant program. (3)  On or before October 1 of each year, the Office of Workforce Development shall submit a report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairmen of the House and Senate Education Committees, the Chairman of the House Workforce Development Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee on the following: (a)  The number of students being served by the program; (b)  The increase, if any, in the number of dual enrollment students; (c)  The courses being most and least utilized with the program; (d)  The number of students who are enrolled in dual enrollment as a result of the program who are interested in furthering their training in the program after the course ends; and (e)  Any other information as deemed appropriate by the chairmen of the committees or the office. (4)  The Office of Workforce Development may use a maximum of one percent (1%) of funds for the program for the administration of the program, and the planning and development districts may use a maximum of two percent (2%) of funds for the program for the administration of the program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.